District of Columbia statutes.
24-284

Inmate Welfare Fund Committee.

(a)

The Inmate Welfare Fund Committee is established for the purpose of administering and supervising the operations of and the expenditures from the Inmate Welfare Fund.

(b)

The Committee shall be composed of the following 5 members:

(1)

The Director of the Department of Corrections, or his or her designee;

(2)

The General Counsel of the Department of Corrections, or his or her designee;

(3)

The Warden of the Central Detention Facility, or his or her designee;

(4)

The Manager of the Office of Internal Controls, Compliance, and Accreditation of the Department of Corrections, or his or her designee; and

(5)

The Director of the Office of Management Information and Technological Services of the Department of Corrections, or his or her designee.

(c)

The Committee shall maintain a record of its authorization and approval for all expenditures from the Fund.

(d)

The Committee may promulgate regulations governing the use and expenditures of the Fund.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 3005, 53 DCR 6899
This section is referenced in § 24-281 and § 24-283.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3005 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3005 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3005 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).